Utah statutes.
78B-2-304.   Within two years.
An action may be brought within two years:
(1)  against a marshal, sheriff, constable, or other officer for liability
incurred during the performance of the officer's official duties or by the
omission of an official duty, including the nonpayment of money collected upon
an execution;
(2)  for recovery of damages for a death caused by the wrongful act or neglect
of another;
(3)  in causes of action against the state and its employees, for injury to
the personal rights of another if not otherwise provided by state or federal
law; or
(4)  in causes of action against a political subdivision of the state and its
employees, for injury to the personal rights of another arising after May 1,
2000, if not otherwise provided by state or federal law.
